Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2868
Pharmacist; patient information; privileged.

(1) Information with regard to a patient maintained by a pharmacist pursuant to the Pharmacy Practice Act shall be privileged and confidential and may be released only to (a) the patient or the caregiver of the patient or others authorized by the patient or his or her legal representative, (b) a physician treating the patient, (c) other physicians or pharmacists when, in the professional judgment of the pharmacist, such release is necessary to protect the patient's health or well-being, or (d) other persons or governmental agencies authorized by law to receive such information.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the release of confidential information to researchers conducting biomedical, pharmaco-epidemiologic, or pharmaco-economic research pursuant to health research approved by an institutional review board which is established in accordance with 21 C.F.R. parts 50 and 56 or 45 C.F.R. part 46, as such parts existed on April 1, 2006.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 56;

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 46;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.36;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 964.